Nebraska, session 109, LB818.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB818 LB818
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 28-310.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
28-310.01 (1) A person commits the offense of assault by
strangulation or suffocation if the person knowingly and intentionally:
(a) Impedes the normal breathing or circulation of the blood of
another person by applying pressure on the throat or neck of the other
person; or
(b) Impedes the normal breathing of another person by covering the
mouth and nose of the person.
(2) An offense is committed under this section regardless of whether
a visible injury resulted.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a
violation of this section is a Class IIIA felony.
(4) A violation of this section is a Class IIA felony if:
(a) The person used or attempted to use a dangerous instrument while
committing the offense;
(b) The person caused serious bodily injury to the other person
while committing the offense; or
(c) The person has been previously convicted:
(i) Of of a violation of this section; or .
(ii) In any other state or federal court of a criminal offense with
essentially the same elements as a violation of this section.
(5) It is an affirmative defense that an act constituting
strangulation or suffocation was the result of a legitimate medical
procedure.
Sec. 2. Section 28-323, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-323 (1) A person commits the offense of domestic assault in the
third degree if he or she:
(a) Intentionally, and knowingly, or recklessly causes bodily injury
to his or her intimate partner; or
-2-

LB818 LB818
2026 2026
(b) Threatens an intimate partner with imminent bodily injury. ; or
(c) Threatens an intimate partner in a menacing manner.
(2) A person commits the offense of domestic assault in the second
degree if he or she:
(a) Intentionally intentionally and knowingly causes bodily injury
to his or her intimate partner with a dangerous instrument; or .
(b) Recklessly causes serious bodily injury to his or her intimate
partner with a dangerous instrument.
(3) A person commits the offense of domestic assault in the first
degree if he or she intentionally and knowingly causes serious bodily
injury to his or her intimate partner.
(4) A violation of subsection (1) of this section is a Class I
misdemeanor, except that such violation shall be punished as a:
(a) Class IIIA felony if the person has one previous conviction for
a violation of subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section or a
substantially equivalent offense; or
(b) Class IIA felony if the person has previously been convicted two
or more times for any violation of subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this
section or any substantially equivalent offense.
(5) A violation of subsection (2) of this section is a Class IIA
felony, except that such violation shall be punished as a Class II felony
if such person has one or more previous convictions for a violation of
subsection (2) or (3) of this section or a substantially equivalent
offense.
(6) A violation of subsection (3) of this section is a Class ID
felony, except that such violation shall be punished as a Class IB felony
with a mandatory minimum sentence of fifteen years' imprisonment if such
person has one or more previous convictions for a violation of subsection
(3) of this section or a substantially equivalent offense.
(4) Violation of subdivision (1)(a) or (b) of this section is a
Class I misdemeanor, except that for any subsequent violation of
-3-

LB818 LB818
2026 2026
subdivision (1)(a) or (b) of this section, any person so offending is
guilty of a Class IIIA felony.
(5) Violation of subdivision (1)(c) of this section is a Class I
misdemeanor.
(6) Violation of subsection (2) of this section is a Class IIIA
felony, except that for any second or subsequent violation of such
subsection, any person so offending is guilty of a Class IIA felony.
(7) Violation of subsection (3) of this section is a Class IIA
felony, except that for any second or subsequent violation under such
subsection, any person so offending is guilty of a Class II felony.
(7) (8) For purposes of this section: ,
(a) Dating relationship means frequent, intimate associations
primarily characterized by the expectation of affectional or sexual
involvement, but does not include a casual relationship or an ordinary
association between persons in a business or social context;
(b) Intimate intimate partner means a spouse; a former spouse;
persons who have a child in common whether or not they have been married
or lived together at any time; and persons who are or were involved in a
dating relationship; and . For purposes of this subsection, dating
relationship means frequent, intimate associations primarily
characterized by the expectation of affectional or sexual involvement,
but does not include a casual relationship or an ordinary association
between persons in a business or social context.
(c) Substantially equivalent offense means a violation of law that:
(i) Is a criminal offense under federal law or the law of another
state; and
(ii) Has essentially the same elements as the violation of this
section to which it is being compared.
Sec. 3. Original section 28-323, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 28-310.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-4-